Washington statutes.
RCW 36.33.120

County lands assessment fund created—Levy for.

The boards of county commissioners may annually levy a tax upon all taxable property in the county, for the purpose of creating a fund to be known as "county lands assessment fund."

[ 1963 c 4 s 36.33.120. Prior: 1929 c 193 s 1; RRS s 4027-1.]